src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/for_liv_yaml_2023_08_17_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    käskõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: käskõt
    käskõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: käskõbõd
    käskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: käskīz
    käskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: käskīzt
    käskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: käskīz
    käskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: käskīzmõ
    käskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [käskīzt, käskīztõ]
    käskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [käskīzt, käskīztõ]
    käskõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: käsk
    käskõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: käskõm
    käskõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: käskõt
    käskõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: käskõt
    käskõ+V+Cond+Sg1: käskõks
    käskõ+V+Cond+Sg2: käskõkst
    käskõ+V+Cond+Sg3: käskõks
    käskõ+V+Cond+Pl1: käskõksmõ
    käskõ+V+Cond+Pl2: käskõkstõ
    käskõ+V+Cond+Pl3: käskõkstõ
    käskõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: käskõks
    käskõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: käskõksmõ
    käskõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: käskõkstõ
    käskõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: käskõkstõ
    käskõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: käsk
    käskõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: käsk
    käskõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: käskõgid
    käskõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: käskõgid
    käskõ+V+Jus+Sg3: käskõg
    käskõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: käskõg
    käskõ+V+Jus+Pl3: käskõgõd
    käskõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: käskõgõd
    käskõ+V+Quo+Sg3: käskiji
    käskõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: käskiji
    käskõ+V+Quo+Pl3: käskijid
    käskõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: käskijid
    käskõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: käskõn
    käskõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: käskõnd
    käskõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: käsktõd
    käskõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: käsktõb
    käskõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: käskiji
    käskõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: käskimi
    
#"N_56a":{"tips":"56a","vards":"kaffe","vcount":"1","bloks":"N","loc":{
    kaffe+N+Sg+Nom: kaffe
    kaffe+N+Sg+Gen: kaffe
    kaffe+N+Sg+Dat: kaffen
    kaffe+N+Sg+Par: kaffezt
    kaffe+N+Sg+Ins: kaffeks
    kaffe+N+Sg+Ill: kaffez
    kaffe+N+Sg+Ine: kaffes
    kaffe+N+Sg+Ela: kaffest
    kaffe+N+Pl+Nom: kaffed
    kaffe+N+Pl+Gen: kaffed
    kaffe+N+Pl+Dat: kaffedõn
    kaffe+N+Pl+Par: kaffidi
    kaffe+N+Pl+Ins: kaffedõks
    kaffe+N+Pl+Ill: kaffiž
    kaffe+N+Pl+Ine: kaffis
    kaffe+N+Pl+Ela: kaffist
    
#"N_94a":{"tips":"94a","vards":"serk","vcount":"81","bloks":"N","loc":{
    serk+N+Sg+Nom: serk
    serk+N+Sg+Gen: serk
    serk+N+Sg+Dat: serkõn
    serk+N+Sg+Par: serkõ
    serk+N+Sg+Ins: serkõks
    serk+N+Sg+Ill: serkõ
    serk+N+Sg+Ine: serksõ
    serk+N+Sg+Ela: serkstõ
    serk+N+Pl+Nom: sērkõd
    serk+N+Pl+Gen: sērkõd
    serk+N+Pl+Dat: sērkõdõn
    serk+N+Pl+Par: sērkidi
    serk+N+Pl+Ins: sērkõdõks
    serk+N+Pl+Ill: sērkiž
    serk+N+Pl+Ine: sērkis
    serk+N+Pl+Ela: sērkist
    
#"N_94b":{"tips":"94b","vards":"kaits","vcount":"12","bloks":"N","loc":{
    kaits+N+Sg+Nom: kaits
    kaits+N+Sg+Gen: kaits
    kaits+N+Sg+Dat: kaitsõn
    kaits+N+Sg+Par: kaitsõ
    kaits+N+Sg+Ins: kaitskõks
    kaits+N+Sg+Ill: kaitsõ
    kaits+N+Sg+Ine: kaitsõs
    kaits+N+Sg+Ela: kaitsõst
    kaits+N+Pl+Nom: kāitsõd
    kaits+N+Pl+Gen: kāitsõd
    kaits+N+Pl+Dat: kāitsõdõn
    kaits+N+Pl+Par: kāitsidi
    kaits+N+Pl+Ins: kāitsõdõks
    kaits+N+Pl+Ill: kāitsiž
    kaits+N+Pl+Ine: kāitsis
    kaits+N+Pl+Ela: kāitsist
    
#"N_123a":{"tips":"123a","vards":"plus","vcount":"2","bloks":"N","loc":{
    plus+N+Sg+Nom: plus
    plus+N+Sg+Gen: plus
    plus+N+Sg+Dat: plussõn
    plus+N+Sg+Par: plussõ
    plus+N+Sg+Ins: plussõks
    plus+N+Sg+Ill: plussõ
    plus+N+Sg+Ine: plussõs
    plus+N+Sg+Ela: plussõst
    plus+N+Pl+Nom: plussõd
    plus+N+Pl+Gen: plussõd
    plus+N+Pl+Dat: plussõdõn
    plus+N+Pl+Par: plussidi
    plus+N+Pl+Ins: plussõdõks
    plus+N+Pl+Ill: plussiž
    plus+N+Pl+Ine: plussis
    plus+N+Pl+Ela: plussist
    
#"N_137a":{"tips":"137a","vards":"vaʼit","vcount":"10","bloks":"N","loc":{
    vait+N+Sg+Nom: vaʼit
    vait+N+Sg+Gen: vaʼit
    vait+N+Sg+Dat: vaʼitõn
    vait+N+Sg+Par: vaʼitõ
    vait+N+Sg+Ins: vaʼitõks
    vait+N+Sg+Ill: vaʼizõ
    vait+N+Sg+Ine: vaʼisõ
    vait+N+Sg+Ela: vaʼistõ
    vait+N+Pl+Nom: vaʼitõd
    vait+N+Pl+Gen: vaʼitõd
    vait+N+Pl+Dat: vaʼitõdõn
    vait+N+Pl+Par: vaʼitidi
    vait+N+Pl+Ins: vaʼitõdõks
    vait+N+Pl+Ill: vaʼitiž
    vait+N+Pl+Ine: vaʼitis
    vait+N+Pl+Ela: vaʼitist
    
#"V_56":{"tips":"56","vards":"erțļõ","vcount":"2","bloks":"V","loc":{
    erțļõ+V+Inf: erțļõ
    erțļõ+V+Ger: erțļõs
    erțļõ+V+Sup: erțļõm
    erțļõ+V+Deb: erțļõmõst
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: erțļõb
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: erțļõd
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: erțļõb
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: erțļõm
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: erțļõt
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: erțļõbõd
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: erțļiz
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ertļizt
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: erțļiz
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: erțļizmõ
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [erțļizt, erțļiztõ]
    erțļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [erțļizt, erțļiztõ]
    erțļõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: erțļõ
    erțļõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: erțļõm
    erțļõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: erțļõt
    erțļõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: erțļõt
    erțļõ+V+Cond+Sg1: erțļõks
    erțļõ+V+Cond+Sg2: erțļõkst
    erțļõ+V+Cond+Sg3: erțļõks
    erțļõ+V+Cond+Pl1: erțļõksmõ
    erțļõ+V+Cond+Pl2: erțļõkstõ
    erțļõ+V+Cond+Pl3: erțļõkstõ
    erțļõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: erțļõks
    erțļõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: erțļõksmõ
    erțļõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: erțļõkstõ
    erțļõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: erțļõkstõ
    erțļõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: erțõl
    erțļõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: erțõl
    erțļõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: erțļõgid
    erțļõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: erțļõgid
    erțļõ+V+Jus+Sg3: erțļõg
    erțļõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: erțļõg
    erțļõ+V+Jus+Pl3: erțļõgõd
    erțļõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: erțļõgõd
    erțļõ+V+Quo+Sg3: erțļiji
    erțļõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: erțļiji
    erțļõ+V+Quo+Pl3: erțļijid
    erțļõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: erțļijid
    erțļõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: erțļõn
    erțļõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: erțļõnd
    erțļõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: erțõltõd
    erțļõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: erțõltõb
    erțļõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: erțļiji
    erțļõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: erțļimi
    
#"V_57ʼ":{"tips":"57ʼ","vards":"nõʼgļõ","vcount":"4","bloks":"V","loc":{
    nõgļõ+V+Inf: nõʼgļõ
    nõgļõ+V+Ger: nõʼgļõs
    nõgļõ+V+Sup: nõʼgļõm
    nõgļõ+V+Deb: nõʼgļõmõst
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nõʼgļõb
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nõʼgļõd
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nõʼgļõb
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nõʼgļõm
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nõʼgļõt
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nõʼgļõbõd
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nõʼgļiz
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: nõʼgļizt
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: nõʼgļiz
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: nõʼgļizmõ
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [nõʼgļizt, nõʼgļiztõ]
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [nõʼgļizt, nõʼgļiztõ]
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: nõʼgļõ
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: nõʼgļõm
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: nõʼgļõt
    nõgļõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: nõʼgļõt
    nõgļõ+V+Cond+Sg1: nõʼgļõks
    nõgļõ+V+Cond+Sg2: nõʼgļõkst
    nõgļõ+V+Cond+Sg3: nõʼgļõks
    nõgļõ+V+Cond+Pl1: nõʼgļõksmõ
    nõgļõ+V+Cond+Pl2: nõʼgļõkstõ
    nõgļõ+V+Cond+Pl3: nõʼgļõkstõ
    nõgļõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: nõʼgļõks
    nõgļõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: nõʼgļõksmõ
    nõgļõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: nõʼgļõkstõ
    nõgļõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: nõʼgļõkstõ
    nõgļõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: nõʼggõl
    nõgļõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: nõʼggõl
    nõgļõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: nõʼgļõgid
    nõgļõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: nõʼgļõgid
    nõgļõ+V+Jus+Sg3: nõʼgļõg
    nõgļõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: nõʼgļõg
    nõgļõ+V+Jus+Pl3: nõʼgļõgõd
    nõgļõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: nõʼgļõgõd
    nõgļõ+V+Quo+Sg3: nõʼgļiji
    nõgļõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: nõʼgļiji
    nõgļõ+V+Quo+Pl3: nõʼgļijid
    nõgļõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: nõʼgļijid
    nõgļõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: nõʼgļõn
    nõgļõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: nõʼgļõnd
    nõgļõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: nõʼggõltõd
    nõgļõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: nõʼggõltõb
    nõgļõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: nõʼgļiji
    nõgļõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: nõʼgļimi
    
#"N_205ʼ":{"tips":"205ʼ","vards":"īʼž","vcount":"1","bloks":"N","loc":{
    īž+N+Sg+Nom: īʼž
    īž+N+Sg+Gen: īʼd
    īž+N+Sg+Dat: īʼdõn
    īž+N+Sg+Par: īʼdtõ
    īž+N+Sg+Ins: īʼdkõks
    īž+N+Sg+Ill: īʼdõ
    īž+N+Sg+Ine: īʼdsõ
    īž+N+Sg+Ela: īʼdstõ
    īž+N+Pl+Nom: īʼd
    īž+N+Pl+Gen: īʼd
    īž+N+Pl+Dat: īʼdõn
    īž+N+Pl+Par: īʼži
    īž+N+Pl+Ins: īʼdkõks
    īž+N+Pl+Ill: īʼdiž
    īž+N+Pl+Ine: īʼdši
    īž+N+Pl+Ela: īʼdšti
    
#"N_11":{"tips":"11","vards":"set","vcount":"3","bloks":"N","loc":{
    set+Pron+Sg+Nom: set
    set+Pron+Sg+Gen: set
    set+Pron+Sg+Dat: setmõn
    set+Pron+Sg+Par: set
    set+Pron+Sg+Ins: setmõks
    set+Pron+Sg+Ill: [setmõ, setmõz]
    set+Pron+Sg+Ine: setmõs
    set+Pron+Sg+Ela: setmõst
    set+Pron+Pl+Nom: setmõd
    set+Pron+Pl+Gen: setmõd
    set+Pron+Pl+Dat: setmõdõn
    set+Pron+Pl+Par: setmidi
    set+Pron+Pl+Ins: setmõdõks
    set+Pron+Pl+Ill: setmiž
    set+Pron+Pl+Ine: setmis
    set+Pron+Pl+Ela: setmist
